North Carolina, session 2025, HB386.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. VEHICLE REGISTRATION FEE INCREASE
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 20-4.02 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-4.02. Quadrennial adjustment of certain fees and rates.
(a) Adjustment for Inflation. – Beginning July 1, 2020, and every four years thereafter,
the Division shall adjust the fees and rates imposed pursuant to the statutes listed in this
subsection for inflation in accordance with the Consumer Price Index computed by the Bureau
of Labor Statistics. The adjustment for per transaction rates in subdivision (8b) of this subsection
shall be rounded to the nearest cent and all other adjustments under this subsection shall be
rounded to the nearest twenty-five cents (25¢):
…
(11) G.S. 20-87, except for including the additional fee for private passenger
vehicles set forth in G.S. 20-87(5) but excluding the additional fee set forth in
G.S. 20-87(6) for private motorcycles.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 20-87 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-87. Passenger vehicle registration fees.
These fees shall be paid to the Division annually for the registration and licensing of
passenger vehicles, according to the following classifications and schedules:
…
(5) Private Passenger Vehicles. –
There shall be paid to the Division annually, as of the first day of January, for
the registration and licensing of private passenger vehicles, fees
according to the following classifications and schedules:
Private passenger vehicles of not more than fifteen passengers.........$38.75
Private passenger vehicles over fifteen passengers............................. 43.25
An additional fee of six dollars and twenty-five cents ($6.25) is imposed on
each private passenger vehicle registered under this subdivision in addition to
*H386-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the base fee. The Commissioner shall, on a monthly basis, transfer the revenue
from the additional fee to the Department of Public Safety. The funds
transferred pursuant to this subdivision shall, in addition to any other funds
appropriated for this purpose, be used to fund State Highway Patrol salaries.
(5a) Provided, that Notwithstanding subdivision (5) of this section, a fee of only
one dollar and thirty cents ($1.30) shall be charged for any vehicle given by
the federal government to any veteran on account of any disability suffered
during war so long as such vehicle is owned by the original donee or other
veteran entitled to receive such gift under Title 38, section 252, United States
Code Annotated.
…."
SECTION 1.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to vehicle
registrations issued or renewed on or after that date.

PART II. APPROPRIATION TO PROVIDE COMPENSATION INCREASES TO
MEMBERS OF THE STATE HIGHWAY PATROL
SECTION 2.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Reserve for Compensation Increases to provide pay raises for the State Highway Patrol the
sum of forty million four hundred thousand dollars ($40,400,000) in recurring funds for each
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to establish the pay scales set forth in this section.
SECTION 2.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, the law enforcement officers of the State
Highway Patrol shall be paid based upon the following experience-based annual salary schedule:
Years of Experience 2025-2027 Biennium
0 $56,000
1 62,125
2 68,250
3 75,375
4 80,500
5 86,625
6 92,750
7 98,875
8+ 105,000
SECTION 2.(c) Effective July 1, 2025, State Highway Patrol employees who are
not subject to an experience-based annual salary schedule shall be paid at the following rates by
rank:
Rank 2025-2027 Biennium
Sergeant $120,750
First Sergeant 132,825
Lieutenant 146,108
Captain 160,718
Major 176,790
Lieutenant Colonel 194,469
Deputy Commander 204,193
Colonel 224,612

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 386-First Edition